Hawaii statutes.
[§577-29] Mental health services
relating to minors; diagnosis, counseling, and related activities. (a)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a minor who is fourteen years of
age or older may consent to mental health treatment or counseling services
provided by a licensed mental health professional if, in the opinion of the
licensed mental health professional, the minor is mature enough to participate
intelligently in the mental health treatment or counseling services; provided
that the consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian shall be required to
prescribe medication to the minor or to place the minor into an out-of-home or
residential treatment program.

(b) The mental health treatment or counseling
services provided to a minor as authorized by this section shall include
involvement of the minor's parent or legal guardian, unless the licensed mental
health professional, after consulting with the minor, determines that the
involvement would be inappropriate. The licensed mental health professional
shall state in the client record whether and when the treating clinician
attempted to contact the minor's parent or legal guardian, and whether the
attempt to contact was successful or unsuccessful, or the reason why, in the
treating licensed mental health professional's opinion, it would be
inappropriate to contact the minor's parent or guardian.

(c) A minor may not abrogate consent provided
by a parent or legal guardian on the minor's behalf. A parent or legal
guardian may not abrogate consent given by the minor on the minor's own behalf.

(d) If a minor consents to receive mental
health treatment or counseling services pursuant to this section, the minor
shall not be liable for payment.

(e) The minor's parent or legal guardian is
not liable for payment for mental health treatment or counseling services
provided pursuant to this section unless the parent or guardian participates in
the mental health treatment or counseling services, and then only for services
rendered with the participation of the parent or guardian.

(f) As used in this section:

"Licensed mental health professional"
means any of the following:

(1) A person licensed as a mental health counselor
pursuant to chapter 453D;

(2) A person licensed as a marriage and family therapist
pursuant to chapter 451J;

(3) A clinical social worker licensed pursuant to
chapter 467E;

(4) A person licensed as a psychologist pursuant to
chapter 465; or

(5) A board certified, or board eligible, licensed
psychiatrist.

"Mental health treatment or counseling
services" means the provision of outpatient mental health treatment or
counseling by a licensed mental health professional. [L 2016, c 181, §1]

Revision Note

In subsection (f), definitions rearranged pursuant to
§23G-15.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next